Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a study to identify the  best
methodology for  determining the appropriate number of students on a workload for a
school-based health practitioner who is a speech-language pathologist,  occupational therapist
or physical therapist. The methodology must take into consideration:
(a) The number of students  eligible for services provided by the school-based health
practitioner;
(b) The level of need of the students eligible for services provided  by the school-based
health practitioner;
(c) The recommended frequency of visits  for students eligible for services provided by the
school-based health practitioner;
(d) The number of schools served by the school-based health practitioner;
(e) The amount of time spent by the school-based health  practitioner preparing doc-
umentation for an individualized education program or participating in meetings for  an in-
dividualized education program; and
(f) Any other workload metrics for a speech-language  pathologist, occupational therapist
or physical therapist that are identified by the department.
(2) For the purpose of conducting the study under this section, the department shall:
(a) Examine workload metrics for speech-language pathologists,  occupational therapists
and physical therapists used in other states; and
(b) Develop, or recommend the adoption of, a  workload metric for speech-language
pathologists, occupational therapists and physical therapists for use in this state.
(3) The department shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than January 5, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on June 30, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 2618 (HB 2618-B) Page 1
Passed by House March 7, 2023
Repassed by House June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2618 (HB 2618-B) Page 2